Wyoming, session 2025, HB0341.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 42-2-601 and 42-2-602 are created to
read:

ARTICLE 6
SUMMER ELECTRONIC BENEFIT TRANSFER PROGRAM FOR CHILDREN

HB0341

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0665
42-2-601. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Electronic benefit transfer" means the
method the state issues benefits described in W.S.
42-2-102(a)(iii) for public welfare benefits;

(ii) "Summer EBT program" means the summer
electronic benefit transfer program for children under 42
U.S.C. § 1762.

42-2-602. Summer EBT program; administration and
management plan; rulemaking.

(a) The department shall, in accordance with 42
U.S.C. § 1762, administer the summer EBT benefit program to
provide nutrition assistance to eligible households to
ensure continued access to food for each eligible child
when school is not in session for the summer. The
department shall issue benefits to qualifying households
under the summer EBT program.

HB0341

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0665
(b) The department shall develop an administration
and management plan for participation in the summer EBT
benefit program as required in 42 U.S.C. § 1762 for each
summer of participation. The department shall submit the
plans to the United States secretary of agriculture by the
deadlines established by the secretary.

(c) The department of education shall provide
information to the department concerning children eligible
for participation in the free and reduced price lunch
program under the national school lunch program established
by 42 U.S.C. § 1751 et seq. for purposes of administering
the summer EBT program.

(d) The department shall adopt rules and regulations
as necessary to implement this section.

Section 2. W.S. 42-2-102(a)(vii) by creating a new
subparagraph (J) is amended to read:

42-2-102. Definitions.

HB0341

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0665
(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided, as
used in this article:

(vii) "Public welfare benefit" means financial
assistance provided to eligible persons in the form of a
performance payment, vendor payment, supplemental nutrition
assistance program benefit, electronic benefit transfer or
cash. These benefits may be received from several state or
federal welfare programs including:

(J) Summer electronic benefit transfer
program for children (summer EBT program).

Section 3.

(a) The department of family services is authorized
up to two (2) temporary full-time positions and one (1)
at-will employee contract position for the period beginning
with the effective date of this act and ending June 30,
2027 for purposes of this act. It is the intent of the
legislature that the department of family services request
the positions necessary for ongoing implementation of the
summer EBT program for children created in section 1 of
HB0341

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0665
this act as an exception request in its supplemental budget
request for the second fiscal year of the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium.

(b) There is appropriated one million one hundred
forty thousand one hundred ninety-three dollars
($1,140,193.00) from the general fund to the department of
family services for the state's share of administrative
costs related to the summer electronic benefit transfer
program created in section 1 of this act. This
appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the
effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2027. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2027. It is the intent of the
legislature that amounts necessary for ongoing
implementation of the summer EBT program for children
created in section 1 of this act be included as an
exception request in the department of family service's
supplemental budget request for the second year of the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

HB0341

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0665
(c) There is appropriated one million one hundred
forty thousand one hundred ninety-four dollars
($1,140,194.00) federal funds for the summer EBT program
created in section 1 of this act.

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0341